Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 202. HARRISON COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER D. CADDO LAKE

Sec. 202.031. FIRING WEAPONS. (a) No person may shoot a pistol or rifle in, on, along, or across Caddo Lake in Harrison County.

(b) This section does not apply to peace officers, game wardens, or representatives of the Parks and Wildlife Commission in the discharge of their official duties, nor does it prevent a person from hunting with a shotgun during an open season or when it is lawful to hunt in or upon Caddo Lake in Harrison County.

(c) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $200.

(d) Venue for prosecutions for violations of this section is in Harrison or Marion counties. Prosecutions may be brought and maintained in either county without regard to the county where the offense was committed.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 78 (H.B. 1346), Sec. 6, eff. May 19, 2011.